Connecticut, session 2026, HB05199.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That section 17b-242 of the general statutes be amended to require the
Commissioner of Social Services to provide the same Medicaid
reimbursement rate for each behavioral health home visit to a building
housing more than one resident rather than reduced rates for
subsequent home visits to the building by the same behavioral health
practitioner.